Louisiana, session 2026, HB342.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Vinaya Alexander,
Landry Bell, Noah Cannino, Erin Carpenter, Corinth Corley, Zachry Edmonston, Carter
Hart, Cameron Hogan, Eden Emily Robinson, Sammy Rollins, and Henry Lee Wray Act".
Section 2. R.S. 17:1946(B)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1946. Procedural safeguards
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) In any special education due process hearing, the local education agency
shall have the burden of proof, including the burden of persuasion and production,
relative to the appropriateness of a student's program or placement or the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 342 ENROLLED
appropriateness of the program or placement proposed by the agency. This burden
shall be met by a preponderance of the evidence.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.